en: French horn finish: Antique/aged finish; Clear lacquer; Gold lacquer; Nickel-plated; Silver-plated; Unlacquered/raw brass; Other
vi: Lớp hoàn thiện kèn Pháp: Bề mặt giả cổ; Phủ bóng trong suốt; Phủ bóng màu vàng; Mạ niken; Mạ bạc; Đồng thau thô/không phủ bóng; Khác
ro-RO: Finisaj corn francez: Finisaj antic/învechit; Lac transparent; Lac auriu; Nichelat; Placat cu argint; Alamă nelăcuită/brută; Altele
de: Finish des Waldhorns: Antik/Gealtertes Finish; Klarlack; Goldlack; Vernickelt; Versilbert; Unlackiert/Rohes Messing; Sonstiges
th: พื้นผิวของแตรเฟร้นช์ฮอร์น: สีโบราณ/แอนทีค; เคลือบแลคเกอร์ใส; เคลือบแลคเกอร์ทอง; ชุบนิกเกิล; ชุบเงิน; ไม่เคลือบแลคเกอร์/ทองเหลืองดิบ; อื่นๆ
nl: Hoorn afwerking: Antieke/verouderde afwerking; Transparante lak; Gouden lak; Vernikkeld; Verzilverd; Ongelakt/ruw messing; Overige
fi: Käyrätorven viimeistely: Antiikkinen/kulutettu viimeistely; Kirkas lakka; Kultalakka; Niklattu; Hopeoitu; Lakkaamaton / raaka messinki; Muu
pl: Wykończenie waltorni: Wykończenie antyczne/postarzane; Lakier bezbarwny; Lakier złoty; Niklowany; Posrebrzany; Nielakierowany/surowy mosiądz; Inny
es: Acabado de la trompa francesa: Acabado antiguo/envejecido; Laca transparente; Laca dorada; Niquelado; Bañado en plata; Sin lacar/latón crudo; Otro
zh-TW: 法國號表面處理: 仿古/作舊處理; 透明漆; 金漆; 鍍鎳; 鍍銀; 無漆/原黃銅; 其他
cs: Povrchová úprava lesního rohu: Starožitná/patinovaná úprava; Průhledný lak; Zlatý lak; Poniklovaná; Postříbřená; Bez laku / surová mosaz; Jiné
hu: Francia kürt felületkezelése: Antikolt / öregbített felület; Átlátszó lakk; Arany lakk; Nikkelezett; Ezüstözött; Lakkozatlan / nyers sárgaréz; Egyéb
zh-CN: 圆号表面处理工艺: 仿古/做旧饰面; 透明清漆; 金色清漆; 镀镍; 镀银; 未涂漆/原黄铜; 其他
pt-PT: acabamento de trompa: Acabamento antigo/envelhecido; Verniz transparente; Verniz dourado; Niquelado; Prateado; Latão não envernizado/bruto; Outro
ja: フレンチホルン仕上げ: アンティーク/エイジドフィニッシュ; クリアラッカー; ゴールドラッカー; ニッケルメッキ; 銀メッキ; アンラッカー/ノーラッカー; その他
sv: Valthornsfinish: Antik/åldrad finish; Klarlack; Guldlack; Förnicklad; Försilvrad; Olackerad/rå mässing; Övrigt
sl-SI: Zaključek francoskega roga: Starinski/postaran videz; Prozoren lak; Zlat lak; Ponikljano; Posrebreno; Nelakirano/surova medenina; Drugo
tr: Fransız kornosu bitişi: Antik/eskitme cila; Transparan lake; Altın lake; Nikel kaplama; Gümüş kaplama; Lakesiz/ham pirinç; Diğer
lt-LT: Valtornos apdaila: Antikvarinė / sendinta apdaila; Skaidrus lakas; Aukso lakas; Nikeliuotas; Padengtas sidabru; Nelakuotas / neapdorotas žalvaris; Kita
pt-BR: Acabamento da trompa: Acabamento envelhecido; Laca transparente; Laca dourada; Niquelado; Banhado a prata; Sem laca/latão bruto; Outro
it: Finitura del corno francese: Finitura anticata/invecchiata; Laccato trasparente; Laccato dorato; Nichelato; Argentato; Non laccato/ottone grezzo; Altro
nb: Valthornfinish: Antikk/aldret finish; Klar lakk; Gullakk; Forniklet; Forsølvet; Ulakkert / ubehandlet messing; Annet
bg-BG: Покритие на валдхорната: Антично/състарено покритие; Прозрачен лак; Златен лак; Никелиран; Посребрен; Без лак/необработен месинг; Друго
ru: Отделка валторны: Античное / состаренное покрытие; Прозрачный лак; Золотой лак; Никелирование; Посеребренное; Без лака / необработанная латунь; Другое
hr-HR: Završna obrada francuskog roga: Antikna/ostarela završna obrada; Prozirni lak; Zlatni lak; Poniklano; Posrebreno; Nelakirano / sirova mjed; Ostalo
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava lesného rohu: Antická/zostarnutá povrchová úprava; Bezfarebný lak; Zlatý lak; Poniklované; Postriebrené; Bez laku/surová mosadz; Iné
el: Φινίρισμα γαλλικού κόρνου: Φινίρισμα αντίκα/παλαιωμένο; Διάφανη λάκα; Χρυσή λάκα; Επινικελωμένο; Επάργυρο; Χωρίς λάκα/ακατέργαστος ορείχαλκος; Άλλο
da: Overfladefinish på valdhorn: Antik/ældet finish; Klar lak; Guldlak; Forniklet; Forsølvet; Ulakeret/rå messing; Andet
ko: 프렌치 호른 마감: 엔틱/빈티지 마감; 투명 래커; 골드 래커; 니켈 도금; 실버 도금; 래커 미처리/로우 브라스; 기타
fr: Finition du cor d’harmonie: Finition antique/vieillie; Vernis transparent; Vernis doré; Nickelé; Plaqué argent; Laiton brut/sans vernis; Autre